Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-401.04
Department of Veterans' Affairs; jurisdiction; State Department of Education; functions.

The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall have jurisdiction over the administration and supervision of all phases of activities under the on-the-job and apprenticeship training, on-the-farm training, and flight training programs for veterans carried on pursuant to Public Law 77 of the Ninetieth Congress, 38 U.S.C. chapter 34, and all amendments thereto, except the State Department of Education shall be the state agency for approving and certifying all educational or training institutions, as defined in Public Law 77 above mentioned, and related training in connection therewith.

Laws 1947, c. 306, § 5, p. 930;

Laws 1969, c. 754, § 4, p. 2839.